District of Columbia statutes.
32-205

Employment of minors under 18 years of age in certain occupations prohibited.

No minor under 18 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work at operating any freight or nonautomatic elevator, or in any quarry, tunnel, or excavation.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 999, ch. 908, § 5
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(5), 23 DCR 514
1981 Ed., § 36-505.
1973 Ed., § 36-205.